testing/sms-test-V-sedggjed.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: sms/bin/sms-gen.hfstol
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: sms/bin/isms.fst
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - sedggjed: # Verb 'to loom' - full paradigm
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sedggjam
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sedggjak
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sedggai
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: sedggjep
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sedggjeˊped
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sedggje 
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+4: sedggjet 

     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sedggjem
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sedggjiǩ
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sedggji
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [sedggjim,sedggjin,sedggjiim,sedggjiin]
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [sedggjid, sedggjiid]
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sedggje
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+4: sedggješ

     sedggjed+V+Pot+Sg1: sedggjeˊžem
     sedggjed+V+Pot+Sg2: sedggjeˊžiǩ
     sedggjed+V+Pot+Sg3: sedggjež
     sedggjed+V+Pot+Pl1: [sedggjeˊžep, sedggjeˊžim]
     sedggjed+V+Pot+Pl2: sedggjeˊžid 
     sedggjed+V+Pot+Pl3: sedggjeˊže
     sedggjed+V+Pot+4: sedggjeˊžet
     sedggjed+V+Pot+ConNeg: sedggjeˊže

     sedggjed+V+Cond+Sg1: sedggjeˊčem
     sedggjed+V+Cond+Sg2: sedggjeˊčiǩ
     sedggjed+V+Cond+Sg3: sedggjeˊči
     sedggjed+V+Cond+Pl1: [sedggjeˊčim, sedggjeˊčep]
     sedggjed+V+Cond+Pl2: sedggjeˊčid
     sedggjed+V+Cond+Pl3: sedggjeˊče
     sedggjed+V+Cond+4: sedggjeˊčeš
     sedggjed+V+Cond+ConNeg: sedggjeˊče

     sedggjed+V+Imp+Sg2: sidggu
     sedggjed+V+Imp+Sg3: sedggjââǥǥas
     sedggjed+V+Imp+Pl1: sedggjâkap
     sedggjed+V+Imp+Pl2: sedggjeˊǩed
     sedggjed+V+Imp+Pl3: sedggjâkaz
     sedggjed+V+Imp+ConNeg+Sg2: sidggu

     sedggjed+V+Imp+ConNeg: sedggjuku

     sedggjed+V+Inf: sedggjed    
     sedggjed+V+ActEss: sedggjeˊmen
     sedggjed+V+Action: sedggjam
     sedggjed+V+PrsPrc: sedggjeei
     sedggjed+V+PrfPrc: sedggjam
     sedggjed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [sedggjummu,sedggjum]
     sedggjed+V+VAbess: [sedggjeǩâni, sedggjeǩeânai]
     sedggjed+V+GerTemp: sedggjeen
     sedggjed+V+GerInstr: sedggjeeˊl
